Nebraska, session 109, LB1003.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 16 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Renewable Energy Consumer Protection Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Renewable energy systems for residential and small business
applications are complex and can be confusing to consumers;
(2) Electric utility rates can change over time and can affect the
payoff period of the initial investment for a renewable energy system;
(3) Renewable energy systems for residential and small business
applications are major purchases which warrant consumer protection and
oversight;
(4) Standardized disclosures, contracting, sales materials,
warranties, and enforcement requirements will better ensure that Nebraska
consumers have the best information available before purchasing or
investing in renewable energy systems; and
(5) Consumers in Nebraska should be given clear and accurate
information regarding the nature of a contract to lease or purchase a
renewable energy system as well as information about rebates, warranties,
and incentive programs.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Renewable Energy Consumer Protection
Act:
(1)(a) Agreement means an agreement between a renewable energy sales
company and a retail electric consumer in the form of:
(i) A contract for the purchase of a renewable energy system or
battery energy storage system; or
(ii) A lease for a third-party-owned renewable energy system or
battery energy storage system.
(b) Agreement includes a cash or financed purchase of a renewable
energy system or battery energy storage system;
(2) Battery energy storage system means a system or facility
intended for residential or small business applications which:
(a) Stores electricity for use at later time;
-2-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
(b) Uses solar energy or wind energy to recharge;
(c) Is located on the real property of a customer of an electric
utility;
(d) Is connected on the customer's side of the electricity meter;
and
(e) Provides electricity to offset customer load on the customer's
real property;
(3) Contact information means a physical address, phone number, and
email address. A post office box shall not be considered a physical
address;
(4) Financing agreement means an agreement involving credit offered
or extended to a consumer to acquire a renewable energy system or battery
energy storage system;
(5) Installation company means:
(a) An entity, other than the consumer, that installs a renewable
energy system or battery energy storage system on behalf of a consumer;
or
(b) A third party from whom a consumer leases such a system;
(6) Lease means a contract in the form of a bailment or lease for
the use of a renewable energy system or battery energy storage system by
a consumer for a period exceeding four months and for a total contractual
obligation not exceeding the applicable threshold amount, pursuant to
applicable federal regulations, whether or not the lessee has the option
to purchase or otherwise become the owner of the system upon the
expiration of the lease;
(7) Renewable energy sales company means an entity that engages:
(a) In a transaction with a consumer to sell, negotiate, or execute
a contract for the sale of a renewable energy system or battery energy
storage system; or
(b) With a consumer to lease a renewable energy system or battery
energy storage system that is owned by a third party from whom the
-3-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
consumer will lease such system;
(8) Renewable energy system means a system or facility intended for
residential or small business applications which uses solar or wind
energy to generate electricity; and
(9) Salesperson means an employee or independent contractor of a
renewable energy sales company who solicits, sells, negotiates, or
executes agreements for renewable energy systems or battery energy
storage systems.
Sec. 4. (1) At least thirty days before entering into an agreement
with a consumer for a renewable energy system or battery energy storage
system, a renewable energy sales company shall provide to the consumer a
written disclosure form that is five pages or less in length and contains
the following information, in a font no smaller than twelve points:
(a) The name of the renewable energy sales company and contact
information for the president or chief executive officer of the company;
(b) The name of the installation company and contact information for
the president or chief executive officer of the company;
(c) The name of the system maintenance provider and contact
information for the president or chief executive officer of the provider;
(d) The payment schedule for up-front costs, including payments due
at the signing date of the agreement and the commencement and completion
dates of the installation;
(e) System design assumptions, including system size, estimated
first-year production, estimated annual system production degradation,
presence of energy storage, energy storage capacity, and a description of
the equipment needed to provide backup power;
(f) An explanation of the maintenance, operation, and monitoring
requirements of the renewable energy system or battery energy storage
system, including an explanation of equipment and labor warranties and
maintenance and repair costs for which the consumer shall be responsible;
(g) Warranties for the repair of all components and parts of the
-4-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
renewable energy system or battery energy storage system and warranties
covering damages to all components and parts of such system, including a
statement that solar panels installed on rooftops may only be authorized
for removal by the renewable energy system sales company, that any
unauthorized removal of a solar panel from a rooftop may void the
warranty, and that any replacement or reinstallation of a solar panel on
a rooftop shall require reinspection by a certified state or municipal
electrical inspector;
(h) Costs and liability for the installation and removal of the
renewable energy system or battery energy storage system;
(i) A description of performance or production guarantees;
(j) Any potential environmental hazards which may affect the quality
of the air, water, land, crops, human beings, livestock, or wildlife on
the land associated with the renewable energy system or battery energy
storage system and within a range of one mile from the perimeter of the
system;
(k) A description of the basis for any cost-savings estimates that
were provided to the consumer. Such description shall include the
applicable utility rates and energy delivery costs, any expected utility
bill savings based upon the consumer's prior twelve months of utility
bills, and the estimated system production at the time of contract
signing;
(l) The potential availability of renewable energy credits,
including an explanation of what renewable energy credits are and how to
find out more about them;
(m) The operational capabilities of the renewable energy system or
battery energy storage system during an electrical outage;
(n) A statement indicating that the renewable energy sales company
is not affiliated with a utility; and
(o) An explanation of any real property access rights required by
the renewable energy sales company or the local utility.
-5-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
(2) At least thirty days before entering into an agreement with a
consumer for a renewable energy system or battery energy storage system,
a renewable energy sales company shall provide a consumer with the
following written statements on separate forms in a font no smaller than
twelve points:
(a) Estimates of cost savings are based upon calculations from the
previous twelve months of utility bills, or, if twelve months of utility
bills are not available, a reasonable estimate of cost savings. The
assumptions, such as the rates a utility charges for electricity, that
are used to estimate the cost savings may change. There may be utility
fees that cannot be offset with a renewable energy system or battery
energy storage system, and, under certain circumstances, compensation for
excess electricity sent back to the grid may be credited to your bill by
the utility at rates below what you pay for electricity; and
(b) The interconnection procedures for a renewable energy system or
battery energy storage system are subject to the policies of the local
utility. For information on the specific interconnection policies and
procedures for a renewable energy system or battery energy storage
system, the consumer should contact the local utility.
(3) In the case of a lease for a renewable energy system or battery
energy storage system in which the renewable energy sales company is the
lessor, at least thirty days before entering into an agreement with a
consumer, the company shall provide the consumer with the written
disclosure form pursuant to subsection (1) of this section with the
following additional information on five additional pages or less in a
font no smaller than twelve points:
(a) The length of the lease;
(b) The amount of each monthly payment for the first year of the
lease;
(c) The estimated total amount of lease payments over the length of
the lease;
-6-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
(d) The rate of any payment increases and the date of the first
increase, if applicable;
(e) The total number of lease payments;
(f) Payment due dates and the manner in which the consumer shall
receive invoices;
(g) A disclosure notifying the consumer whether the lessor will be
filing a Uniform Commercial Code fixture filing on the renewable energy
system or battery energy storage system and the impact on any future sale
of the real property;
(h) A disclosure describing the transferability of the lease and the
conditions for lease transfers in connection with a consumer selling the
real property; and
(i) An explanation of any real property access rights required by
the lessor.
(4) In the case of a purchase of a residential renewable energy
system or battery energy storage system, at least thirty days before
entering an agreement with a consumer, a renewable energy sales company
shall provide a consumer with the written disclosure form pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section with the following additional information
on three additional pages or less in a font no smaller than twelve
points:
(a) The purchase price;
(b) Estimated start and completion dates for installation,
accompanied by the following statement: Start and completion dates are
only an estimate and may be impacted by delays that may be outside the
control of the renewable energy installation company;
(c) A disclosure notifying the consumer of the party or parties
responsible for obtaining interconnection approval;
(d) The following statement: Laws and regulations about state and
federal tax credits are subject to change. Any statement made in these
disclosures should not be construed as tax advice. The purchaser of a
-7-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
renewable energy system or battery energy storage system is hereby
encouraged to consult a tax expert regarding any reductions or potential
reductions in tax liability associated with purchasing a renewable energy
system or battery energy storage system; and
(e) A link to the local utility's webpage which contains information
explaining the utility's interconnection procedures.
Sec. 5. (1) A contract for the sale or lease of a renewable energy
system or battery energy storage system shall:
(a) Include in conspicuous language, key contract terms such as
price and financing terms;
(b) Be written in English; and
(c) Include a dispute resolution process where the resolution
process includes a third-party arbitrator agreed upon by the customer and
where any relevant arbitration hearings take place in person within the
county where the renewable energy system or battery energy storage system
was installed. Whenever a dispute, including any attempt to reclaim
property or discontinue service, is initiated by the renewable energy
system sales company or an agent of such company, notice of the dispute
shall be sent to the customer or lessee by registered mail no fewer than
sixty days prior to the start date of the resolution process and the
notice shall include an explanation of the disputed contractual
obligations or conditions, the reasons for the dispute, the date that the
resolution process shall begin, any costs to be incurred by the customer,
and an explanation of the customer's rights.
(2) An agreement for the sale of a renewable energy system or a
battery energy storage system shall contain the following information:
(a) The name of the renewable energy sales company and contact
information for the president or chief executive officer of the company;
(b) The name of the installation company and contact information for
the president or chief executive officer of the company; and
(c) The name of and contact information for the sales person
-8-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
associated with the renewable energy sales company who sold, solicited,
or negotiated the sale of the renewable energy system or battery energy
storage system.
(3) A salesperson who sells, solicits, or negotiates a sales
agreement shall disclose the following information to the consumer at
least sixty days before a purchase agreement may be made:
(a) The purchase price of the renewable energy system or battery
energy storage system;
(b) The payment schedule, if applicable;
(c) A description of the project, including the system size
expressed in kilowatts of direct current electricity and kilowatts of
alternating current electricity and any solar module, inverter, or
battery energy storage system to be installed;
(d) The estimated start and completion dates for installation
accompanied by the following statement: The actual start and completion
dates depend upon many factors, such as delays related to permitting and
interconnection approvals. Interconnection approvals are controlled by
the local utility;
(e) An explanation of any warranties or guarantees, including the
transferability of any obligations, in compliance with the Magnuson-Moss
Warranty-Federal Trade Commission Improvements Act, 15 U.S.C. 2301 et
seq.;
(f) The name and contact information of the local utility; and
(g) A statement indicating which party or parties are responsible
for filing the interconnection application as well as applications for
any other related permits.
(4) A salesperson who sells, solicits, or negotiates a lease
agreement shall disclose the following information to the consumer at
least sixty days before a lease agreement may be made:
(a) The name and contact information of the lessor, the renewable
energy system or battery energy storage system manufacturer, the
-9-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
installation company, and the salesperson who negotiated the lease
agreement;
(b) The method or methods of communication to be used by the
salesperson to contact the consumer;
(c) The total payments required pursuant to the lease and the
payment schedule, including the number, amount, and due dates or periods
of payments;
(d) A description of the project, including the system size
expressed in kilowatts of direct current electricity and kilowatts of
alternating current electricity and any solar module, inverter, or
battery energy storage system to be installed;
(e) The estimated start and completion dates for installation
accompanied by the following statement: The actual start and completion
dates depend upon many factors, such as delays related to permitting and
interconnection approvals. Interconnection approvals are controlled by
the local utility;
(f) An explanation of any warranties or guarantees, including the
transferability of any obligations in compliance with the Magnuson-Moss
Warranty-Federal Trade Commission Improvements Act, 15 U.S.C. 2301 et
seq.;
(g) A description of the maintenance and repair responsibilities of
each party;
(h) An explanation of whether the consumer has the right to purchase
the leased renewable energy system or battery energy storage system,
either during the lease term or at the termination of the lease, and, if
applicable, the purchase price;
(i) A description of the consumer's options to transfer the lease to
a third party and the conditions for such transfer;
(j) Which party or parties are responsible for filing the
interconnection application and permits as well as applications for any
other related permits;
-10-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
(k) A description of any security interest filed against the system,
including Uniform Commercial Code financing statements; and
(l) Any real property access rights to be obtained by the lessor.
(5) In the case of the sale of a renewable energy system or battery
energy storage system, the sales agreement shall include:
(a) A statement indicating that the consumer has five business days
after receiving the initial signed agreement to cancel the agreement
without a financial penalty, with the exception of any nonrefundable
deposits collected before receipt of the signed sales agreement, in an
amount not to exceed one hundred dollars;
(b) A statement indicating that the seller has verbally explained to
the consumer the consumer's right to rescind the agreement without
financial penalty upon the consumer signing the agreement and that the
consumer has been verbally provided with the specific date that the sales
agreement may be cancelled without financial penalty, with the exception
of any nonrefundable deposits collected;
(c) The following statement in a bold font no smaller than twelve
points adjacent to the signature line: The purchaser may cancel this
transaction at any time prior to midnight in the time zone where the
renewable energy system or battery energy storage system is to be
installed on the fifth business day after the date of this transaction
provided that the cancellation notice is sent to the president, chief
executive officer, or salesperson of the renewable energy sales company
or the president or chief executive officer of the installation company,
and that the proof of the date or time of the cancellation notice may be
verified by way of a receipt showing that the cancellation notice was
sent by way of certified mail, registered mail, or by professional
courier service, or by evidence that the cancellation notice was sent
through email before time expired for the cancellation period;
(d) A cancellation form written in the same format as in federal
regulations regarding cooling-off periods for sales made for homes or
-11-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
other locations; and
(e) A statement showing that compliance with federal regulations
adopted under the Federal Trade Commission Act of 1914, 15 U.S.C. 41 et
seq., regarding cooling-off periods for sales made at homes or at other
locations constitutes compliance with this subsection (5).
Sec. 6. If a renewable energy system or battery energy storage
system is financed, the financing documents shall include the following:
(1) The length, terms, and cost of the financing agreement in clear
and conspicuous language;
(2) A statement that a salesperson may be employed by more than one
renewable energy sales company; and
(3) A notification of any security interest filed against the
system, including Uniform Commercial Code financing statements.
Sec. 7. (1) An independent contractor may be retained by a
renewable energy sales company as a salesperson. Notwithstanding the
salesperson's status as an independent contractor, the renewable energy
sales company that employs the independent contractor as a salesperson is
responsible for ensuring compliance with the Renewable Energy Consumer
Protection Act and for any loss or damages resulting from noncompliance
by the independent contractor when acting on behalf of the renewable
energy sales company.
(2) A salesperson may be employed by more than one renewable energy
sales company.
(3) Unless otherwise authorized in a state law or local government
ordinance or invited by consumer, a salesperson shall not visit a
residence to conduct the sale of a renewable energy storage system or
battery energy storage system except between the hours of 9 a.m. and 8
p.m. within the time zone of the consumer.
(4) A salesperson shall not visit a residence that has posted a no
solicitation sign in a prominent location near the main entrance to the
residence.
-12-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
Sec. 8. (1) For purposes of this section, written or digital sales
material means an online sales banner, click-through banner, social media
advertisement, pamphlet, booklet, and any other materials that could
generate a sale or sale lead of a renewable energy system or a battery
energy storage system, whether such material is delivered in person,
through the United States Postal Service, through a private courier
service, through email, or through other online means.
(2) Renewable energy sales companies and salespersons for renewable
energy sales companies are prohibited from:
(a) Providing written, video, photographic, or digital sales
material for a renewable energy system or battery energy storage system
which includes a name, logo, picture, or other indicia of an electric
utility unless the renewable energy sales company or the salesperson has
received expressed written consent to provide such material from the
relevant utility;
(b) Purchasing sales leads from a renewable energy sales company
which fails to comply with the requirements of this section;
(c) Representing, verbally or in writing, that the renewable energy
sales company is affiliated with, sponsored by, or approved by a
consumer's local utility without the expressed written consent of the
local utility; and
(d) Representing, verbally or in writing, that the renewable energy
sales company is affiliated with, sponsored by, or approved by a state
incentive program without the expressed written consent of the agency in
charge of administrating such incentive program.
Sec. 9. (1) A renewable energy sales company, a salesperson
representing a renewable energy sales company, and any other person
designated to represent a renewable energy sales company for an agreement
shall retain a copy of each signed agreement and any warranties for a
period of at least ten years after the date of the transaction.
(2) A consumer's personal information is confidential.
-13-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
Sec. 10. (1) Within three days after entering into an agreement, a
renewable energy sales company, a salesperson, or a designated
representative of the renewable energy sales company shall conduct an in-
person welcome call with the new consumer.
(2) The welcome call shall include the following information:
(a) Confirmation of the identification of the consumer;
(b) The price of the renewable energy system or battery energy
storage system;
(c) A description of the project, including the system size
expressed in kilowatts of direct current electricity and kilowatts of
alternating current electricity, any battery energy storage system to be
installed and the capacity of such system expressed in kilowatt-hours,
and a statement that the renewable energy system will not provide backup
power without being paired with a battery energy storage system;
(d) In the case of a lease, the duration of the contract;
(e) A statement indicating the consumer's right to cancel the
agreement without financial penalty within five days after signing the
contract;
(f) A reminder that the consumer should review the disclosure form
and agreement before the end of the fifth day after signing the contract;
and
(g) An explanation of the costs of the system being installed and
any other applicable financing terms or details.
Sec. 11. (1) A renewable energy sales company shall provide the
consumer with a warranty against roof damage and water infiltration
whenever roof penetration is made for the installation of a renewable
energy system or battery energy storage system and such warranty shall be
for a period of at least five years after the completion date of the
installation.
(2) A renewable energy sales company shall provide the consumer with
a warranty addressing defects in the workmanship of a renewable energy
-14-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
system or battery energy storage system and such warranty shall be for a
period of at least five years after the completion date of the
installation.
(3) If a renewable energy sales company provides the consumer with a
long-term maintenance plan for a renewable energy system or a battery
energy storage system, such plan shall be made available to the consumer
in writing and verbally. If a renewable energy sales company does not
provide such a plan, the renewable energy sales company shall provide the
consumer with a written explanation as to why a long-term maintenance
plan is not being offered or provided.
Sec. 12. A violation of the Renewable Energy Consumer Protection
Act shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under the Uniform
Deceptive Trade Practices Act and shall be subject to any remedies or
penalties available for a violation of such act.
Sec. 13. An electric utility that serves more than five thousand
meters that offers financial incentives for renewable energy systems or
battery energy storage systems shall clearly and prominently provide the
following information on the utility's website:
(1) Information on the number of financial incentives available for
such systems, including information about the amount of budget that has
already been spent to date and information about when the budget was last
updated;
(2) Information about how a customer or contractor can apply for the
financial incentives; and
(3) Information about the point in the process in which a customer
may secure financial incentives from a utility program.
Sec. 14. A renewable energy sales company or agent of such company
shall not sell or lease a renewable energy system or battery energy
storage system in this state without first registering their business
with the Secretary of State. Any such company or agent shall disclose
proof of registration with the Secretary of State to the customer before
-15-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
entering into an agreement. Failure to disclose proof of registration
before entering into an agreement shall render the agreement void.
Sec. 15. (1) A person shall not install a renewable energy system
or a battery energy storage system in this state unless such person is
licensed as an electrical contractor in Nebraska.
(2) A renewable energy system or battery energy storage system shall
not be installed without first acquiring a relevant permit from the
municipality where the system is to be installed or from the State of
Nebraska.
Sec. 16. The State Electric Board shall adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations for the licensing and bonding of any person who installs
renewable energy systems or battery energy storage systems in this state.
Sec. 17. Section 87-302, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
87-302 (a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in
the course of his or her business, vocation, or occupation, he or she:
(1) Passes off goods or services as those of another;
(2) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the
source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;
(3) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to
affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by,
another;
(4) Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic
origin in connection with goods or services;
(5) Represents that goods or services have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do
not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status,
affiliation, or connection that he or she does not have;
(6) Represents that goods or services do not have sponsorship,
approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities
that they have or that a person does not have a sponsorship, approval,
-16-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
status, affiliation, or connection that he or she has;
(7) Represents that goods are original or new if they are
deteriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand,
except that sellers may repair damage to and make adjustments on or
replace parts of otherwise new goods in an effort to place such goods in
compliance with factory specifications;
(8) Represents that goods or services are of a particular standard,
quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if
they are of another;
(9) Disparages the goods, services, or business of another by false
or misleading representation of fact;
(10) Advertises goods or services with intent not to sell them as
advertised or advertises the price in any manner calculated or tending to
mislead or in any way deceive a person;
(11) Advertises goods or services with intent not to supply
reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a
limitation of quantity;
(12) Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the
reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;
(13) Uses or promotes the use of or establishes, operates, or
participates in a pyramid promotional scheme in connection with the
solicitation of such scheme to members of the public. This subdivision
shall not be construed to prohibit a plan or operation, or to define a
plan or operation as a pyramid promotional scheme, based on the fact that
participants in the plan or operation give consideration in return for
the right to receive compensation based upon purchases of goods,
services, or intangible property by participants for personal use,
consumption, or resale so long as the plan or operation does not promote
or induce inventory loading and the plan or operation implements an
appropriate inventory repurchase program;
(14) With respect to a sale or lease to a natural person of goods or
-17-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
services purchased or leased primarily for personal, family, household,
or agricultural purposes, uses or employs any referral or chain referral
sales technique, plan, arrangement, or agreement;
(15) Knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in a privacy
policy, published on the Internet or otherwise distributed or published,
regarding the use of personal information submitted by members of the
public;
(16) Uses any scheme or device to defraud by means of:
(i) Obtaining money or property by knowingly false or fraudulent
pretenses, representations, or promises; or
(ii) Selling, distributing, supplying, furnishing, or procuring any
property for the purpose of furthering such scheme;
(17) Offers an unsolicited check, through the mail or by other
means, to promote goods or services if the cashing or depositing of the
check obligates the endorser or payee identified on the check to pay for
goods or services. This subdivision does not apply to an extension of
credit or an offer to lend money;
(18) Mails or causes to be sent an unsolicited billing statement,
invoice, or other document that appears to obligate the consumer to make
a payment for services or merchandise he or she did not order;
(19)(i) Installs, offers to install, or makes available for
installation or download a covered file-sharing program on a computer not
owned by such person without providing clear and conspicuous notice to
the owner or authorized user of the computer that files on that computer
will be made available to the public and without requiring intentional
and affirmative activation of the file-sharing function of such covered
file-sharing program by the owner or authorized user of the computer; or
(ii) Prevents reasonable efforts to block the installation,
execution, or disabling of a covered file-sharing program;
(20) Violates any provision of the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection
Act;
-18-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
(21) In connection with the solicitation of funds or other assets
for any charitable purpose, or in connection with any solicitation which
represents that funds or assets will be used for any charitable purpose,
uses or employs any deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise,
misrepresentation, unfair practice, or concealment, suppression, or
omission of any material fact;
(22)(i) In the manufacture, production, importation, distribution,
promotion, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sale of
a substance:
(A) Makes a deceptive or misleading representation or designation,
or omits material information, about a substance or fails to identify the
contents of the package or the nature of the substance contained inside
the package; or
(B) Causes confusion or misunderstanding as to the effects a
substance causes when ingested, injected, inhaled, or otherwise
introduced into the human body.
(ii) A person shall be deemed to have committed a violation of the
Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act for each individually packaged
product that is either manufactured, produced, imported, distributed,
promoted, displayed for sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or
sold in violation of this section. A violation under this subdivision (a)
(22) shall be treated as a separate and distinct violation from any other
offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the
person was in violation of this section;
(23)(i) Manufactures, produces, publishes, distributes, monetizes,
promotes, or otherwise makes publicly available any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, any obscene material, or any material that is
harmful to minors in which any person depicted as a participant or
observer:
(A) Is under eighteen years of age;
(B) Is a trafficking victim;
-19-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
(C) Has not expressly and voluntarily consented to such person's
depiction; or
(D) Participated in any act depicted without consent.
(ii) This subdivision (a)(23) does not apply to any
telecommunications or broadband Internet access service.
(iii) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(23):
(A) Harmful to minors has the same meaning as in 47 U.S.C. 254, as
such section existed on January 1, 2024;
(B) Obscene material has the same meaning as in section 28-807;
(C) Promote means to use any mechanism or publication, or take any
action, that suggests, highlights, advertises, markets, curates,
backlinks, hashtags, or otherwise directs, attempts to direct, or
encourages traffic toward specific materials, including acts carried out
affirmatively, through automation, algorithmically, and via other
technical means both known and unknown at this time;
(D) Publish means to communicate or make information available to
another person via an Internet website, regardless of whether the person
consuming, viewing, or receiving the material gives any consideration for
the published material;
(E) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830;
(F) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct has the same
meaning as in section 28-1802; and
(G) Without consent has the same meaning as in section 28-318;
(24) Offers or enters into a right-to-list home sale agreement as
defined in section 81-885.01; or
(25) Violates section 81-2,282; or .
(26) Violates any provision of the Renewable Energy Consumer
Protection Act.
(b) In order to prevail in an action under the Uniform Deceptive
Trade Practices Act, a complainant need not prove competition between the
parties.
-20-

LB1003 LB1003
2026 2026
(c) This section does not affect unfair trade practices otherwise
actionable at common law or under other statutes of this state.
Sec. 18. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 19. Original section 87-302, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-21-